src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_SÄKKÄRÄ

[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ö    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
[STYLE=RARE]:ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[STYLE=RARE]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;

LEXICON A_HAPERA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
[STYLE=RARE]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[STYLE=RARE]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;

LEXICON A_HÖPPÄNÄ





[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ö    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HARMAJA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LATUSKA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HAILAKKA




[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:o     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ko     A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RÄVÄKKÄ
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:kö   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:ö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:kö     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:kö     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ö     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
[CMP=POS]:kö     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ö    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_POHATTA




[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:to   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:to   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:to   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:to     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:to     A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:to     A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
[CMP=POS]:to   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AINOA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_OIKEE




[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:e  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KORKEA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
[STYLE=ARCHAIC]:a   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

LEXICON A_JÄREÄ




[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
[STYLE=ARCHAIC]:ä   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;

LEXICON A_AIEMPI




[CMP=POS]:pi A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa  A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ma  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:m    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ia    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;
[CMP=POS]:pa   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:m    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄHEMPI




[CMP=POS]:pi   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä  A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:mä  A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:m    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:p     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:pä  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mä    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:m   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VAPAA
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PEEAA
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_MUU
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
[CMP=POS]:u A_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:u  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SYYPÄÄ
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_GAY




[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;


 

LEXICON A_SUURI
[CMP=POS]:i A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:e A_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON A_PIENI
[CMP=POS]:i A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:e A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:e A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON A_UUSI
[CMP=POS]:si A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:te A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:de A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
[CMP=POS]:te A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:t A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
[CMP=POS]:s A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:de    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
